Hawaii, session 2025, HB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There shall be established a two-year pilot program to conduct stream maintenance activities.  The pilot program shall focus on the city-owned portions of the following streams: (1)  Kapalama stream; (2)  Waolani stream; (3)  Pauoa stream; (4)  Nuuanu stream; and (5)  Alewa drainage canal. (b)  The city and county of Honolulu department of facility maintenance shall implement the pilot program, which shall include: (1)  Regular inspection and assessment of stream conditions; (2)  Clearing of vegetation, debris, and other blockages that may lead to flooding after heavy rains or other natural disasters; and (3)  Data collection and reporting on the effectiveness of the stream maintenance activities in reducing flood risks. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to implement the stream maintenance pilot program pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the city and county of Honolulu department of facility maintenance for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The city and county of Honolulu department of facility maintenance shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028.  The report shall include: (1)  A summary of activities conducted under the pilot program; (2)  An assessment of the pilot program's effectiveness in reducing flood risks; (3)  Any challenges or issues encountered during implementation; and (4)  Recommendations for continuation, modification, or expansion of the pilot program. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________